Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.67, subdivision 40, is amended to read: Subd. 40. new text begin Firearm safety devices; new text end firearm storage units. (a) new text begin Safety devices and new text end secure firearm storage units are exempt. For the purposes of this subdivision: (1) new text begin "firearm safety device" means:new text end new text begin (i) a device that, when installed on a firearm, is designed to prevent the firearm from being operated without first deactivating the device; or new text end new text begin (ii) a device to be equipped or installed on a firearm that is designed to prevent the operation of the firearm by anyone who does not have authorized access to the firearm; new text end new text begin (2) new text end "secure firearm storage unit" means a container that is fully enclosed and locked by a padlock, keylock, combination lock, or similar locking device, and is either specifically designed for the safe storage of firearms or sold for that purpose by a federally licensed firearms dealer; and deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end "firearm" has the meaning provided in section 97A.015, subdivision 19. new text begin (b) A firearm sold with a firearm safety device already installed on it is treated as the sale of a firearm and not the sale of a firearm safety device. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The seller of a new text begin firearm safety device or new text end secure firearm storage unit must neither collect, nor transmit to any private or public entity, any personal data of or information about a purchaser resulting from a sale eligible for the exemption under this subdivision. new text begin If information about the purchase or transfer of a firearm safety device or firearm storage unit is required to be collected by a government entity, all data pertaining to that purchase or transfer are private data on individuals, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12, or nonpublic data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 9.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end